Illinois, session 104th, SB3207.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    (20 ILCS 1340/Act rep.)5    Section 5. The Regional Integrated Behavioral Health 6Networks Act is repealed. 7    (20 ILCS 1705/64 rep.)8    Section 10. The Mental Health and Developmental 9Disabilities Administrative Act is amended by repealing 10Section 64. 11    Section 15. The Bureau for the Blind Act is amended by 12changing Section 7 as follows: 13    (20 ILCS 2410/7)  (from Ch. 23, par. 3417)14    Sec. 7. Council. There shall be created within the 15Department a Blind Services Planning Council which shall 16review the actions of the Bureau for the Blind and provide 17advice and consultation to the Secretary on services to blind 18people. The Council shall be composed of 11 members appointed 19by the Governor. All members shall be selected because of 20their ability to provide worthwhile consultation or services 21to the blind. No fewer than 6 members shall be blind. A   SB3207 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 18722 KTG 32165 b1relative balance between the number of males and females shall 2be maintained. Broad representation shall be sought by 3appointment, with 2 members from each of the major statewide 4consumer organizations of the blind and one member from a 5specific service area including, but not limited to, the 6Hadley School for the Blind, Chicago Lighthouse, 7Department-approved Low Vision Aids Clinics, Vending 8Facilities Operators, the Association for the Education and 9Rehabilitation of the Blind and Visually Impaired (AER), blind 10homemakers, outstanding competitive employers of blind people, 11providers and recipients of income maintenance programs, 12in-home care programs, subsidized housing, nursing homes, and 13homes for the blind.14    Initially, 4 members shall be appointed for terms of one 15year, 4 for terms of 2 years, and 3 for terms of 3 years with a 16partial term of 18 months or more counting as a full term. 17Subsequent terms shall be 4 3 years each. No member shall serve 18more than 3 2 terms. No Department employee shall be a member 19of the Council.20    Members shall be removed for cause, including, but not 21limited to, demonstrated incompetence, unethical behavior, and 22unwillingness or inability to serve.23    Members shall serve without pay but shall be reimbursed 24for actual expenses incurred in the performance of their 25duties.26    Members shall be governed by appropriate and applicable   SB3207 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 18722 KTG 32165 b1State and federal statutes and regulations on matters such as 2ethics, confidentiality, freedom of information, travel, and 3civil rights.4    Department staff may attend meetings but shall not be a 5voting member of the Council. The Council shall elect a 6chairperson and a recording secretary from among its number. 7Sub-committees and ad hoc committees may be created to 8concentrate on specific program components or initiative 9areas.10    The Council shall perform the following functions:11        (a) Facilitate communication and cooperative efforts 12    between the Department and all agencies which have any 13    responsibility to deliver services to blind and visually 14    impaired persons.15        (b) Identify needs and problems related to blind and 16    visually impaired persons, including children, adults, and 17    seniors, and make recommendations to the Secretary, Bureau 18    Director, and Governor.19        (c) Recommend programmatic and fiscal priorities 20    governing the provision of services and awarding of grants 21    or contracts by the Department to any person or agency, 22    public or private.23        (d) Conduct, encourage, and advise independent 24    research by qualified evaluators to improve services to 25    blind and visually impaired persons, including those with 26    multiple disabilities.  SB3207 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 18722 KTG 32165 b1        (e) Participate in the development and review of 2    proposed and amended rules and regulations of the 3    Department relating to services for the blind and visually 4    impaired.5        (f) Review and comment on all budgets (drafted and 6    submitted) relating to services for blind and visually 7    impaired persons.8        (g) Promote policies and programs to educate the 9    public and elicit public support for services to blind and 10    visually impaired persons.11        (h) Encourage creative and innovative programs to 12    strengthen, expand, and improve services for blind and 13    visually impaired persons, including outreach services.14        (i) Perform such other duties as may be required by 15    the Governor, Secretary, and Bureau Director.16    The Council shall supersede and replace all advisory 17committees now functioning within the Bureau of Rehabilitation 18Services for the Blind, with the exception of federally 19mandated advisory groups.20(Source: P.A. 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 21    (325 ILCS 27/Act rep.)22    Section 20. The Afterschool Youth Development Project Act 23is repealed. 24    Section 25. The Mental Health and Developmental   SB3207 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 18722 KTG 32165 b1Disabilities Code is amended by changing Sections 5-111, 25-113, and 6-101 as follows: 3    (405 ILCS 5/5-111)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 5-111)4    Sec. 5-111. Any person who has been issued a Notice of 5Determination of sums due as services charges may petition the 6Department for a review of that determination. The petition 7must be in writing and filed with the Department within 90 days 8from the date of the Notice of Determination. The Department 9shall provide for a hearing to be held on the charges for the 10period covered by the petition. The Department may after such 11hearing, cancel, modify or increase such former determination 12to an amount not to exceed the maximum provided for such person 13by this Act. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with 14the Department's rules under 89 Ill. Adm. Code 508 and Article 1510 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. A final 16administrative decision of the Department is subject to 17judicial review under Section 6-101. The Department at its 18expense shall take testimony and preserve a record of all 19proceedings at the hearing upon any petition for a release 20from or modification of such determination. The petition and 21other documents in the nature of pleadings and motions filed 22in the case, a transcript of testimony, findings of the 23Department, and orders of the Secretary constitute the record. 24The Secretary shall furnish a transcript of such record to any 25person upon payment therefor of 75¢ per page for each original   SB3207 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 18722 KTG 32165 b1transcript and 25¢ per page for each copy thereof. Any person 2aggrieved by the decision of the Department upon such hearing 3may, within 30 days thereafter, file a petition with the 4Department for review of such decision by the Board of 5Reimbursement Appeals. The Board of Reimbursement Appeals may 6approve action taken by the Department or may remand the case 7to the Secretary with recommendations for redetermination of 8charges.9(Source: P.A. 89-507, eff. 7-1-97.) 10    (405 ILCS 5/5-113)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 5-113)11    Sec. 5-113. Following a final administrative decision and 12upon Upon receiving a petition for review under Section 5-111, 13the Department shall thereupon notify the Board of 14Reimbursement Appeals which shall render its decision thereon 15within 30 days after the petition is filed and certify such 16decision to the Department. Concurrence of a majority of the 17Board is necessary in any such decision. Upon request of the 18Department, the State's Attorney of the county in which a 19responsible relative or a recipient who is liable under this 20Act for payment of sums representing services charges resides, 21shall institute appropriate legal action against any such 22responsible relative, or the recipient, or within the time 23provided by law shall file a claim against the estate of such 24recipient who fails or refuses to pay those charges. The court 25shall order the payment of sums due for services charges for   SB3207 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 18722 KTG 32165 b1such period or periods of time as the circumstances require, 2except that no responsible relative may be held liable for 3charges for services furnished to a recipient if such charges 4were assessed more than 5 years prior to the time the action is 5filed; but such 5 year limitation does not apply to the 6liability of a recipient or recipient's estate. Such order may 7be entered against any or all such defendants and may be based 8upon the proportionate ability of each defendant to contribute 9to the payment of sums representing services charges including 10the actual charges for services in facilities outside the 11Department where the Department has paid such charges. Orders 12for the payment of money may be enforced by attachment as for 13contempt against the persons of the defendants and, in 14addition, as other judgments for the payment of money, and 15costs may be adjudged against the defendants and apportioned 16among them.17(Source: P.A. 80-1414.) 18    (405 ILCS 5/6-101)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 6-101)19    Sec. 6-101. Any person affected by a final administrative 20decision of the Department or the Board of Reimbursement 21Appeals, pursuant to this Act, may have such decisions 22reviewed only under and in accordance with the Administrative 23Review Law, as now or hereafter amended. The Administrative 24Review Law, as amended, and the rules adopted pursuant 25thereto, apply to and govern all proceedings for the judicial   SB3207 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 18722 KTG 32165 b1review of final administrative decisions of the Department 2hereunder. The term "administrative decision" is defined as in 3Section 3-101 of the Code of Civil Procedure.4(Source: P.A. 82-783.) 5    (405 ILCS 5/5-112 rep.)6    Section 30. The Mental Health and Developmental 7Disabilities Code is amended by repealing Section 5-112. 8    Section 35. The Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act is 9amended by changing Section 90 as follows: 10    (725 ILCS 207/90)11    Sec. 90. Committed persons ability to pay for services. 12Each person committed or detained under this Act who receives 13services provided directly or funded by the Department and the 14estate of that person is liable for the payment of sums 15representing charges for services to the person at a rate to be 16determined by the Department. Services charges against that 17person take effect on the date of admission or the effective 18date of this Section. The Department in its rules may 19establish a maximum rate for the cost of services. In the case 20of any person who has received residential services from the 21Department, whether directly from the Department or through a 22public or private agency or entity funded by the Department, 23the liability shall be the same regardless of the source of   SB3207 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 18722 KTG 32165 b1services. When the person is placed in a facility outside the 2Department, the facility shall collect reimbursement from the 3person. The Department may supplement the contribution of the 4person to private facilities after all other sources of income 5have been utilized; however the supplement shall not exceed 6the allowable rate under Title XVIII or Title XIX of the 7Federal Social Security Act for those persons eligible for 8those respective programs. The Department may pay the actual 9costs of services or maintenance in the facility and may 10collect reimbursement for the entire amount paid from the 11person or an amount not to exceed the maximum. Lesser or 12greater amounts may be accepted by the Department when 13conditions warrant that action or when offered by persons not 14liable under this Act. Nothing in this Section shall preclude 15the Department from applying federal benefits that are 16specifically provided for the care and treatment of a person 17with a disability toward the cost of care provided by a State 18facility or private agency. The Department may investigate the 19financial condition of each person committed under this Act, 20may make determinations of the ability of each such person to 21pay sums representing services charges, and for those purposes 22may set a standard as a basis of judgment of ability to pay. 23The Department shall by rule make provisions for unusual and 24exceptional circumstances in the application of that standard. 25The Department may issue to any person liable under this Act a 26statement of amount due as treatment charges requiring him or   SB3207 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 18722 KTG 32165 b1her to pay monthly, quarterly, or otherwise as may be 2arranged, an amount not exceeding that required under this 3Act, plus fees to which the Department may be entitled under 4this Act.5    (a) Whenever an individual is covered, in part or in 6whole, under any type of insurance arrangement, private or 7public, for services provided by the Department, the proceeds 8from the insurance shall be considered as part of the 9individual's ability to pay notwithstanding that the insurance 10contract was entered into by a person other than the 11individual or that the premiums for the insurance were paid 12for by a person other than the individual. Remittances from 13intermediary agencies under Title XVIII of the Federal Social 14Security Act for services to committed persons shall be 15deposited with the State Treasurer and placed in the Mental 16Health Fund. Payments received from the Department of 17Healthcare and Family Services under Title XIX of the Federal 18Social Security Act for services to those persons shall be 19deposited with the State Treasurer and shall be placed in the 20General Revenue Fund.21    (b) Any person who has been issued a Notice of 22Determination of sums due as services charges may petition the 23Department for a review of that determination. The petition 24must be in writing and filed with the Department within 90 days 25from the date of the Notice of Determination. The Department 26shall provide for a hearing to be held on the charges for the   SB3207 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 18722 KTG 32165 b1period covered by the petition. The Department may after the 2hearing, cancel, modify, or increase the former determination 3to an amount not to exceed the maximum provided for the person 4by this Act. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with 5the Department's rules under 89 Ill. Adm. Code 508 and Article 610 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. Any person 7affected by a final administrative decision of the Department, 8pursuant to this Section, may have such decision reviewed only 9under and in accordance with the Administrative Review Law. 10The Administrative Review Law and the rules adopted pursuant 11thereto apply to and govern all proceedings for the judicial 12review of final administrative decisions of the Department 13under this Section. As used in this subsection, 14"administrative decision" has the same meaning ascribed to 15that term in Section 3-101 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The 16Department at its expense shall take testimony and preserve a 17record of all proceedings at the hearing upon any petition for 18a release from or modification of the determination. The 19petition and other documents in the nature of pleadings and 20motions filed in the case, a transcript of testimony, findings 21of the Department, and orders of the Secretary constitute the 22record. The Secretary shall furnish a transcript of the record 23to any person upon payment of 75¢ per page for each original 24transcript and 25¢ per page for each copy of the transcript. 25Any person aggrieved by the decision of the Department upon a 26hearing may, within 30 days thereafter, file a petition with   SB3207 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 18722 KTG 32165 b1the Department for review of the decision by the Board of 2Reimbursement Appeals established in the Mental Health and 3Developmental Disabilities Code. The Board of Reimbursement 4Appeals may approve action taken by the Department or may 5remand the case to the Secretary with recommendation for 6redetermination of charges.7    (c) Following a final administrative decision and upon 8Upon receiving a petition for review under subsection (b) of 9this Section, the Department shall thereupon notify the Board 10of Reimbursement Appeals which shall render its decision 11thereon within 30 days after the petition is filed and certify 12such decision to the Department. Concurrence of a majority of 13the Board is necessary in any such decision. Upon request of 14the Department, the State's Attorney of the county in which a 15client who is liable under this Act for payment of sums 16representing services charges resides, shall institute 17appropriate legal action against any such client, or within 18the time provided by law shall file a claim against the estate 19of the client who fails or refuses to pay those charges. The 20court shall order the payment of sums due for services charges 21for such period or periods of time as the circumstances 22require. The order may be entered against any defendant and 23may be based upon the proportionate ability of each defendant 24to contribute to the payment of sums representing services 25charges including the actual charges for services in 26facilities outside the Department where the Department has   SB3207 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 18722 KTG 32165 b1paid those charges. Orders for the payment of money may be 2enforced by attachment as for contempt against the persons of 3the defendants and, in addition, as other judgments for the 4payment of money, and costs may be adjudged against the 5defendants and apportioned among them.6    (d) The money collected shall be deposited into the Mental 7Health Fund.8(Source: P.A. 99-143, eff. 7-27-15.)